Utah statutes.
41-6a-527.   Seizure and impoundment of vehicles by peace officers -- Impound requirements -- Removal of vehicle by owner -- Forfeiture.

(1)  If a peace officer arrests, cites, or refers for administrative action the operator of a vehicle for violating Section 41-6a-502, 41-6a-517, 41-6a-518.2, 41-6a-520, 41-6a-530, 41-6a-606, 53-3-231, 53-3-232, Subsections 53-3-227(3)(a)(i) through (vi), Subsection 53-3-227(3)(a)(ix), or a local ordinance similar to Section 41-6a-502 which complies with Subsection 41-6a-510(1), the peace officer shall seize and impound the vehicle in accordance with Section 41-6a-1406, except as provided under Subsection (2).

(2)  If a registered owner of the vehicle, other than the operator, is present at the time of arrest, the peace officer may release the vehicle to that registered owner, but only if:

(a)  the registered owner:

(i)  requests to remove the vehicle from the scene; and

(ii)  presents to the peace officer sufficient identification to prove ownership of the vehicle or motorboat;

(b)  the registered owner identifies a driver with a valid operator's license who:

(i)  complies with all restrictions of his operator's license; and

(ii)  would not, in the judgment of the officer, be in violation of Section 41-6a-502, 41-6a-517, 41-6a-518.2, 41-6a-520, 41-6a-530, 53-3-231, 53-3-232, or a local ordinance similar to Section 41-6a-502 which complies with Subsection 41-6a-510(1) if permitted to operate the vehicle; and

(c)  the vehicle itself is legally operable.

(3)  If necessary for transportation of a motorboat for impoundment under this section, the motorboat's trailer may be used to transport the motorboat.

(4)  A motor vehicle is subject to criminal or civil forfeiture under the procedures and substantive protections established in Title 24, Chapter 1, Utah Uniform Forfeiture Procedures Act, upon a finding by the court that:

(a)  the motor vehicle was used in a violation of Section 41-6a-502, 41-6a-517, a local ordinance which complies with the requirements of Subsection 41-6a-510(1), Subsection 58-37-8(2)(g), or Section 76-5-207;

(b)  the operator of the vehicle has previously been convicted of a violation committed after May 12, 2009, of:

(i)  a felony driving under the influence violation under Section 41-6a-502;

(ii)  a felony violation of Subsection 58-37-8(2)(g); or

(iii)  automobile homicide under Section 76-5-207;

(c)  the operator of the vehicle was driving on a denied, suspended, revoked, or disqualified license; and

(d) (i)  the denial, suspension, revocation, or disqualification under Subsection (4)(c) was imposed because of a violation of:

(A)  Section 41-6a-502;

(B)  Section 41-6a-517;

(C)  a local ordinance which complies with the requirements of Subsection 41-6a-510(1);

(D)  Section 41-6a-520;

(E)  Subsection 58-37-8(2)(g);

(F)  Section 76-5-207; or

(G)  a criminal prohibition that the person was charged with violating as a result of a plea bargain after having been originally charged with violating one or more of the sections or ordinances described in Subsections (4)(d)(i)(A) through (F); or

(ii) (A)  the denial, suspension, revocation, or disqualification described in Subsection (4)(c) is an extension imposed under Subsection 53-3-220(2) of a denial, suspension, revocation, or disqualification; and

(B)  the original denial, suspension, revocation, or disqualification was imposed because of a violation described in Subsection (4)(d)(i)(A) through (G).



Amended by Chapter 81, 2012 General Session

